test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-49lwpma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `lõpma: # Verb (49) `lõpma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lõpma+V+Inf/mA: lõpma
     lõpma+V+Inf: lõppõq
     lõpma+V+Act+PrfPrc: lõpnuq
     lõpma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [lõpõt, lõpõtu]

     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lõpõ
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [lõpõt, lõpõdõq]
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lõpõs
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lõpõmiq
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lõpõtiq
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lõpvaq
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: lõpõ
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lõppi
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [lõppit, lõppiq, lõppidõq]
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lõppi
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lõppimiq
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lõppitiq
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lõppiq, lõppivaq]

     lõpma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lõpõtas

     lõpma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lõpva

     lõpma+V+Jus: lõpkuq
